Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-2201 to 43-2209:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Family finding means the process described in section 43-2203;

(3) Family member means:

(a) A person related to a child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship;

(b) A stepparent;

(c) A stepsibling;

(d) The spouse, widow, widower, or former spouse of any of the persons described in subdivisions (a) through (c) of this subdivision; and

(e) Any individual who is a primary caretaker or trusted adult in a kinship home and who, as a primary caretaker, has lived with the child or, as a trusted adult, has a preexisting, significant relationship with the child;

(4) Kinship home means a home in which a child receives foster care and at least one of the primary caretakers has previously lived with or is a trusted adult that has a preexisting, significant relationship with the child;

(5) Provider means an organization providing services as a child-placing agency; and

(6) Service area means a geographic area administered by the department and designated pursuant to section 81-3116.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 2.